Hawaii statutes.
§578-15 Secrecy of proceedings and
records. (a) The records in adoption proceedings, after the petition is
filed and prior to the entry of the decree, shall be open to inspection only by
the parties or their attorneys, the director of human services or the
director's agent, or by any proper person on a showing of good cause therefor,
upon order of the court. Except in the case of an individual being adopted by
a person married to the legal father or mother of the individual or unless
authorized by the court, no petition for adoption shall set forth the name of
the individual sought to be adopted or the name of either of the parents of the
individual; provided that the legal name of the individual and the name of each
of the individual's legal parents may be added to the petition by amendment
during the course of the hearing thereof and shall be included in the decree.
The hearing of the petition shall be in chambers and shall not be open to the
public.

(b) Upon the entry of the decree, or upon the
later effective date of the decree, or upon the dismissal or discontinuance or
other final disposition of the petition, the clerk of the court shall seal all
records in the proceedings; provided that upon the written request of the
petitioner or petitioners, the court may waive the requirement that the records
be sealed. The seal shall not be broken and the records shall not be inspected
by any person, including the parties to the proceedings, except:

(1) Upon order of the family court upon a showing of
good cause;

(2) After the adopted individual attains the age of
eighteen and upon submission to the family court of a written request for
inspection by the adopted individual or the adoptive parents;

(3) After the adopted individual attains the age of
eighteen and upon submission to the family court of a written request for
inspection by the natural parents;

(4) Upon request by the adopted individual or the
adoptive parents for information contained in the records concerning ethnic
background and necessary medical information; or

(5) Upon request by a natural parent for a copy of
the original birth certificate.

As used in this subsection, "natural
parent" means a biological mother or father, or a legal parent who is not
also the biological parent.

(c) The clerk of the court shall keep a docket
of all adoption proceedings, which may be inspected only by order of the family
court. [L 1945, c 40, pt of §2; am L 1953, c 115, pt of §1; RL 1955, §331-15;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §20; HRS §578-15; am L 1973, c 211, §3(m); am L 1976, c
194, §1(9); gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L 1990, c 338, §5; am L 1991,
c 45, §1; am L 2016, c 80, §2]

Rules of Court

Confidentiality, see HFCR rule 79.

Law Journals and Reviews

Privacy v. Secrecy: The Open Adoption Records Movement and
Its Impact on Hawai‘i. 15 UH L. Rev. 483.

Case Notes

Cited: 45 H. 69, 79, 361 P.2d 1054.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next